Washington statutes.
RCW 18.79.460

Multistate license—Background checks.

(1) In screening applicants to obtain or retain a multistate license under RCW 18.80.020, the board shall:

(a) Obtain fingerprints from each applicant for a multistate license;

(b) Submit the fingerprints through the state patrol to the federal bureau of investigation for a national criminal history background check;

(c) Receive the results of the federal bureau of investigation national criminal history background check; and

(d) Use the results in making multistate licensure decisions.

(2) The results of the federal bureau of investigation national criminal history background check are confidential. The board shall not release the results to the public, the interstate commission of nurse licensure compact administrators, or the licensing board of any other state.

(3) Nothing in chapter 123, Laws of 2023 shall be construed to authorize the board to participate in the federal bureau of investigation service, known as rap back, which identifies changes in criminal history record information against retained fingerprints.

(4) For purposes of this section, "multistate license" means the same as defined in RCW 18.80.010.

[ 2023 c 123 s 14.]

NOTES:

Short title—2023 c 123: See RCW 18.80.900.